Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.027

Salaries of public officials—State policy enunciated.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of this state to base the salaries of public officials on realistic standards in order that such officials may be paid according to the true value of their services and the best qualified citizens may be attracted to public service. It is the purpose of this section and RCW 43.03.040 to effectuate this policy by utilizing the expert knowledge of citizens having access to pertinent facts concerning proper salaries for public officials, thus removing and dispelling any thought of political consideration in fixing the appropriateness of the amount of such salaries.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 43 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: "Sections 1 through 118, 120 through 122, and 124 through 150 of chapter 7, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect June 30, 2010." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 12; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 150.]

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 43: "If any provision of this 1970 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected." [ 1970 ex.s. c 43 s 7.]